Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB121.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Center for Gun Violence Research Act.Section 2. Findings.The General Assembly finds and declares the following:(1) Gun violence is a significant public health crisis and public safety problem in this Commonwealth and nationwide. Nationally, rates of fatal gun violence have remained essentially unchanged for more than a decade, as declines in homicide have been offset by increases in suicide.(2) For the decade ending in 2010, Pennsylvania had 12,941 gun-related deaths, which ranked fourth highest in the United States. During that same decade, the rate of gun 123456789101112131415161718 homicides among children and teenagers in this Commonwealth ranked as one of the highest in the nation.(3) The annual cost of gun violence across the United States is estimated to be more than $100,000,000,000 and could be as high as $229,000,000,000 per year.(4) Too little is known about gun violence, its causes and the best practices for its prevention. There is a substantial need for publicly funded academic research in gun violence. The need for more research and more sophisticated research is critical in fighting the plague of gun violence in our schools and communities.(5) Federal funding for gun violence research through the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention was effectively eliminated by Congress in 1996 through the passage of a provision known as the Dickey Amendment.(6) It is the intent of this act to provide State funding for gun violence research in place of the Federal funding that has been curtailed by the Dickey Amendment.Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Center." The Center for Gun Violence Research established under section 4."University." Any of the following:(1) An independent institution of higher education located in and incorporated or chartered by the Commonwealth, entitled to confer degrees as specified in 24 Pa.C.S. § 6505 (relating to power to confer degrees) and entitled to apply to itself the designation "college," "university" or 20250SB0121PN0071 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "seminary" as provided for by standards and qualifications prescribed by the State Board of Education under 24 Pa.C.S. Ch. 65 (relating to private colleges, universities and seminaries).(2) A State-owned institution.(3) A State-related institution.Section 4. Center for Gun Violence Research.(a) Establishment.--The Center for Gun Violence Research is established as a research center for gun violence in this Commonwealth. The center shall be administered by a university selected by the Governor under section 5(i).(b) Mission.--The center's mission shall be to conduct independent academic research on gun violence in this Commonwealth and to provide policymakers, including the General Assembly, the Governor, State agencies and local governments with scientific evidence to develop sound gun violence prevention policies and programs.(c) Nonpartisan research.--The center shall conduct research on a nonpartisan basis.Section 5. Location of center.(a) Request for proposals.--Proposals for the location and operation of the center shall be solicited through a request for proposals.(b) Public notice.--Public notice of the request for proposals shall be given in the same manner as provided under 62 Pa.C.S. § 512(c) (relating to competitive sealed bidding).(c) Receipt of proposals.--Universities shall submit proposals in the form and time period as established by the evaluation committee established under subsection (e).(d) Opening of proposals.--Proposals shall be opened in a 20250SB0121PN0071 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 manner which avoids disclosure of the proposal's contents to competing offerors.(e) Evaluation committee.--An evaluation committee is established to review all proposals and make recommendations to the Governor as provided under subsection (h). The committee shall be comprised of the following members:(1) The Attorney General of the Commonwealth.(2) The Secretary of Corrections.(3) The Secretary of Education.(4) The Secretary of Health.(5) The Secretary of Human Services.(6) The chair of the Pennsylvania Commission on Crime and Delinquency.(7) The Commissioner of Pennsylvania State Police.(f) Evaluation criteria.--The relative importance of the evaluation factors shall be fixed prior to opening the proposals. No individual who has been employed within the preceding two years by an applying university may participate in the evaluation of proposals.(g) Discussion with responsible offerors and revision of proposals.--(1) As provided in the request for proposals, the evaluation committee may hold discussions with a university for purposes of reviewing and clarifying the university's proposal.(2) A university shall be accorded fair and equal treatment with respect to any opportunity for discussion, review or revision of a proposal.(3) In conducting a discussion under paragraph (1), the evaluation committee shall not disclose any information 20250SB0121PN0071 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 derived from proposals submitted by competing universities.(h) Recommendation to Governor.--The two universities whose proposals are determined in writing to be the most advantageous to the Commonwealth for carrying out the intent of this act and the mission of the center shall be recommended to the Governor for final selection.(i) Selection by Governor.--Within 10 days of receipt of the recommendations under subsection (h), the Governor shall select the university to operate the center.Section 6. Duties.(a) Collaboration.--The center shall work on a continuing basis with the Governor, the General Assembly and local governments to identify, implement and evaluate innovative gun violence prevention policies and programs.(b) Methods.--The center shall conduct basic, translational and transformative research using scientific-based methods to develop and analyze gun violence prevention policies and programs.(c) Research.--The center shall conduct interdisciplinary research that shall, at a minimum, include the following:(1) The nature of gun violence, including individual and societal determinants of risk for involvement in gun violence, whether as a victim or a perpetrator.(2) The individual, community and societal consequences of gun violence.(3) Prevention and treatment of gun violence at the individual, community and societal levels.(4) Effectiveness of existing laws and policies intended to reduce gun violence, including the criminal misuse of firearms and efforts to promote responsible ownership and 20250SB0121PN0071 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 firearm use.(5) Analysis of data and statistics of gun-related crime that occurs in this Commonwealth.(6) The financial impact of gun violence on this Commonwealth, political subdivisions, hospitals, social service agencies and other entities impacted by gun violence.(d) Cooperation.--Unless specifically prohibited by law, each State agency, county district attorney's office, local police department and county or municipal health department shall provide to the center, upon request, the data necessary for the center to conduct the research required under this act.(e) Reports.--Biennially, the center shall submit a report to the Governor and the General Assembly on the center's activities, including research projects completed during the prior two years, current research projects and other information the center deems relevant.(f) Internet website.--The center shall maintain a publicly accessible Internet website and post all of the center's completed research.Section 7. Funding.(a) General Assembly.--The General Assembly shall annually provide an appropriation to fund the activities of the center.(b) Grants.--(1) The center may supplement the center's own research by awarding competitive grants to nonprofit organizations that conduct gun violence research.(2) All research money shall be awarded on scientific merit as determined by an open and competitive peer review process that ensures objectivity, consistency and high quality. All qualified investigators, regardless of 20250SB0121PN0071 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 institutional affiliation, shall have equal access and opportunity to compete for grant money.(3) The peer review process for the selection of grants awarded under this section shall be modeled on the grant-making process used by the National Institutes of Health.(4) Grants awarded under this subsection shall be made from the appropriation provided by the General Assembly.(c) Research by grantees.--Research completed by a nonprofit organization through a grant awarded under subsection (b) shall:(1) Belong to the center.(2) Be posted on the center's publicly accessible Internet website.(3) Be distributed to the Governor and the General Assembly.(d) Submission for funding.--The university housing the center shall, on an annual basis, submit a request for funding to the Office of the Budget for inclusion in the Governor's budget proposal. Funding for the center shall appear as a separate line item in the Governor's proposed budget.Section 8. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0121PN0071 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021